Illinois, session 104th, HB4314.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hospital Emergency Service Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 80/1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 86)7    Sec. 1. Requirements to provide emergency medical care. 8    (a) Every hospital required to be licensed by the 9Department of Public Health pursuant to the Hospital Licensing 10Act which provides general medical and surgical hospital 11services, except long-term acute care hospitals and 12rehabilitation hospitals identified in Section 1.3 of this 13Act, shall provide a hospital emergency service in accordance 14with rules and regulations adopted by the Department of Public 15Health and shall furnish such hospital emergency services to 16any applicant who applies for the same in case of injury or 17acute medical condition where the same is liable to cause 18death or severe injury or serious illness. Every hospital 19required to provide a hospital emergency service under this 20Section shall have at least one licensed physician who 21specializes in emergency medicine staffing the emergency 22department at all times. For purposes of this Act, "applicant" 23includes any person who presents at the hospital or who is   HB4314- 2 -LRB104 16447 BAB 29840 b1brought to a hospital by ambulance or specialized emergency 2medical services vehicle as defined in the Emergency Medical 3Services (EMS) Systems Act. Hospitals shall furnish hospital 4emergency services, including as described in subsections 5(b-1) and (b-2), in accordance with the procedures required by 6the federal Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act 7(EMTALA), including, but not limited to, medical screening, 8the provision of necessary stabilizing treatment, procedures 9for refusals to consent, restricting transfers until the 10individual is stabilized, appropriate transfers of patients, 11nondiscrimination, no delay in examination or treatment, and 12whistleblower protections. 13    (b-1) For purposes of this Act, "injury or acute medical 14condition where the same is liable to cause death or severe 15injury or serious illness" includes, but is not limited to, 16when a pregnant patient is experiencing ectopic pregnancy, 17complications of pregnancy loss, risks to future fertility, 18previable preterm premature rupture of membranes (PPROM), or 19emergent hypertensive disorders, such as preeclampsia. 20    (b-2) For purposes of this Act, "stabilizing treatment" 21includes abortion when abortion is necessary to resolve the 22patient's injury or acute medical condition that is liable to 23cause death or severe injury or serious illness. 24    (c) The amendments to this Section are declarative of 25existing law. 26    (d) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to alter   HB4314- 3 -LRB104 16447 BAB 29840 b1existing legal statuses and rights. 2(Source: P.A. 103-784, eff. 8-7-24.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.